de: Bauteiltoleranz: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Толеранс на компонента: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Други
zh-TW: 元件公差: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 其他
lt-LT: Komponento tolerancija: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Kita
vi: Dung sai linh kiện: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Khác
pt-PT: Tolerância do componente: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Outro
sv: Komponenttolerans: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tolerância do componente: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Outro
zh-CN: 组件容差: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 其他
en: Component tolerance: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Other
nb: Komponent toleranse: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Annet
el: Ανοχή εξαρτήματος: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tolerancia súčiastky: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Iné
it: Tolleranza del componente: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Altro
ja: コンポーネント許容誤差: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; その他
hr-HR: Tolerancija komponente: ± 0,01 %; ± 0,05 %; ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 5 %; Ostalo
ru: Допуск компонента: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Другой
th: ความคลาดเคลื่อนของส่วนประกอบ: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; อื่นๆ
tr: Bileşen toleransı: %±0.01; %±0.05; %±0.1; %±0.25; %±0.5; %±1; %±10; %±2; %±20; %±5; Diğer
sl-SI: Toleranca komponente: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Drugo
nl: Component tolerantie: ± 0,01 %; ± 0,05 %; ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 5 %; Andere
ko: 컴포넌트 허용 오차: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 기타
fr: Tolérance du composant: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Autre
cs: Tolerance součástky: ±0.01 %; ±0.05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Jiné
ro-RO: Toleranță componentă: ±0.01%; ±0.05%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Altele
fi: Komponentin toleranssi: ±0,01 %; ±0,05 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Muu
da: Komponenttolerance: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Andet
hu: Komponens-tűréshatár: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Egyéb
pl: Tolerancja komponentu: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Inne
es: Tolerancia del componente: ±0,01%; ±0,05%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Otros